src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON ÅEREDH_TV   !!≈ * **@CODE@** row A - Group I   NO -øø-UMLAUT!!!!
                   +V+TV+Ind+Prs+Uml:%>%^1UMLa         V-I-PRS-SG         ; ! class I special
                       +V+TV+Ind+Prs:%>ie              VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;
                       +V+TV+Ind+Prt:%>iej             VSUF-ODD-PRT       ;
! +V+TV+Ind+Prt+Uml:%>%^iUML    VSUF-PRT ; NO -øø-UMLAUT!!!!
                         +V+TV+Imprt:%>                VSUF-EVEN-IMP      ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
                           +V+TV+Inf:%>edh             FINAL1             ;
                        +V+TV+ConNeg:%>ieh             FINAL1             ;
                          +V+TV+VGen:%>ien             FINAL1             ;
! +V+TV+Act:%>eme           FINAL1 ;
                           +V+TV+Ger:%>ieminie         FINAL1             ;
                        +V+TV+PrsPrc:%>ije             flagFINAL1             ;
! +V+TV+PrsPrc:%>ijes        FINAL1 ;
                    +V+TV+PrfPrc+Uml:%>%^1UMLeme       FINAL1             ;
! row F trigger for Umlaut Prt
! Derivations
! -----------
                +V+TV+Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»iej  flagIJE_ODD            ;
        +V+TV+Der3+Der/NomAg+N+Err/Orth:%»ij  flagIJE_ODD            ;
               +V+TV+Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»iem  flagNomActOdd          ;
                  +V+TV+Der1+Der/les+A:%»%^1UML          LES_LASSE_ie       ;
            +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+Uml:%»%^1UMLasovv     SOVVEDH            ;
!                 +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML       VÅÅJNEDH           ;
              +V+TV+Der3+Der/InchL+V:%»iegået          GÅETEDH            ;
              +V+TV+Der1+Der/st+V:%»iest            DÅAJVOEHTIDH       ;
               +V+TV+Der1+Der/l+V:%»iel             GOLTELIDH          ;
             +V+TV+Der1+Der/htj+V:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj GOLTELIDH          ;
                +V+TV+Der1+Der/ht:%»ieht            DÅAJVOEHTIDH_TV    ;
! +V+TV+Der1+Der/Caus:%»iedeht ÅARAJEHTEDH_TV ; !we have -didh + -ehte
              +V+TV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V:%»iejahtj         AHTJE              ;
               +V+TV+Der1+Der/htalle:%»%^1UMLahtall    SOVVEDH            ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
                +V+TV+Der1+Der/lg:%»%^1UMLalg       LGIDH              ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
              +V+TV+Der1+Der/ldihkie+A:%»%^1UMLaldihk ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP           ;
               +V+TV+Der1+Der/ldahke+N:%»%^1UMLaldahk    flagLDAHKE             ;
       +V+TV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Cmp/SgNom:%»%^1UMLeldh      R                  ;
         +V+TV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom:%»%^1UMLeldh      flagFINAL1             ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%»%^1UMLeld       flagFINAL1             ; !
 
 



LEXICON TJEARODH_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                    +V+TV:                  TJEARODH ;
 +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+Uml:%»%^2UMLesovv     SOVVEDH  ;
!      +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML       VÅÅJNEDH ;
    +V+TV+Der1+Der/htalle:%»%^PASSUMLehtall SOVVEDH  ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
     +V+TV+Der1+Der/lg:%»%^PASSUMLelg    LGIDH    ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs


LEXICON TJEARODH_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                    +V+IV:              TJEARODH     ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL+Uml:%»%^2UMLesovv IV_PASSIVE_L ;
!      +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML   IV_PASSIVE_S ;


LEXICON TJEARODH   !!≈ * **@CODE@** row C - Group II
                       +Ind+Prs:%>                  V-II-PRS-SG        ; ! class II special
                       +Ind+Prs:%>oe                VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;
                       +Ind+Prt:%>oej               VSUF-PRT           ;
                         +Imprt:%>                  VSUF-II-EVEN-IMP   ;
            +Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/NG:%>oej               FINAL1             ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
                           +Inf:%>odh               FINAL1             ;
                           +Inf+Use/NG:%>ijh               FINAL1             ; ! south-south sami
                        +ConNeg:%>oeh               FINAL1             ;
                          +VGen:%>oen               FINAL1             ;
! +Act:%>eme           FINAL1 ;
                           +Ger:%>oeminie           FINAL1             ;
                        +PrsPrc:%>oje               flagFINAL1             ;
! +PrsPrc:%>ojes        FINAL1 ;
                    +PrfPrc+Uml:%>%^2UMLeme         FINAL1             ;
! Derivations
! -----------
                +Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»oej  flagN_ODD              ;
               +Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»oem  flagNomActOdd          ;
                  +Der1+Der/les+A:%»%^PASSUMLel       LES                ;
              +Der3+Der/InchL+V:%»oegået            GÅETEDH            ;
              +Der1+Der/st+V:%»oest              DÅAJVOEHTIDH       ;
               +Der1+Der/l+V:%»oel               GOLTELIDH          ;
                +Der1+Der/ht:%»oeht              DÅAJVOEHTIDH_TV    ;
! +Der1+Der/Caus:%»oedeht ÅARAJEHTEDH_TV ; !we have -didh + -ehte
              +Der3+Der/ahtje+V:%»oejahtj           AHTJE              ;
               +Der1+Der/d+V:%»%^PASSUMLed       GOLTELIDH          ; ! oe?
       +Der1+Der/d+V+Err/Orth:%»oed               GOLTELIDH          ; ! Miesie Mavve
              +Der1+Der/ldihkie+A:%»%^PASSUMLeldihk ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP           ;
               +Der1+Der/ldahke+N:%»%^PASSUMLeldahk   flagLDAHKE             ;
       +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Cmp/SgNom:%»%^PASSUMLeldh     R                  ;
         +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom:%»%^PASSUMLeldh     flagFINAL1             ;
 +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%»%^PASSUMLeld      flagFINAL1             ; !
